Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.010

Application of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter relating to domestic corporations shall apply to:

(1) All corporations organized hereunder; and

(2) All corporations which were heretofore organized under any act repealed by the Washington nonprofit corporation act and which are not organized for a purpose or in a manner provided for by said act.

The provisions of this chapter relating to foreign corporations shall apply to all foreign corporations conducting affairs in this state for a purpose or purposes for which a corporation might be organized under this chapter.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 2.]